dev/ortho/lat-ara.twol
Alphabet

a:ا 
e:ە 
b:ب 
p:پ 
t:ت 
j:ج 
c:چ 
x:خ 
d:د 
r:ر 
z:ز 
s:س 
g:غ 
f:ف 
q:ق 
k:ك 
g:گ 
n:ڭ 
l:ل 
m:م 
n:ن 
h:ھ 
o:و 
u:ۇ 
ö:ۆ 
ü:ۈ 
w:ۋ 
é:ې 
i:ى 
y:ي 
k:ک 
':ئ 

;

Sets

Vows = a e o u ö ü é i ;

HDeleters = چ غ ش ژ ;

Rules

"Insert word-initial hamzas before vowels"
0:ئ <=> .#.  _ Vows: ;

! The latin orthography distinguishes between ڭ and نگ with an apostrophe (ng vs. n'g)
"Delete apostrophes between n and g"
':0 <=> n: _ g:  ;

! In principle there are ambiguities in the Latin orthography:
! sh -> سھ or ش?
! zh -> زھ or ژ?
! gh -> گھ or غ?
! The two-character output are much less common, but we allow both here.
"sh/zh/gh bigram rule"
[ s:ش | z:ژ | g:غ]  => _ h: ;

"h deletion rule"
h:0 <=> :HDeleters _ ;

! The sequence "ng" is not ambiguous in isolation, but the sequence "ngh" is:
! ngh -> ڭھ or نغ? (but never نگھ)
! The latter mapping is much more common, but we allow both.
"ng bigam rule"
n:ڭ => _ g: ;

"Never map g:گ when the immediately precending segment is mapping to ن"
g:گ /<= :ن _ ;

"g deletion rule"
g:0 <=> :ڭ _ ;
